Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70.05.080 and 1993 c 492 s 240 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If the local board of health or other official responsible for appointing a local health officer under RCW 70.05.050 refuses or neglects to appoint a local health officer after a vacancy exists, the secretary of health may appoint a local health officer and fix the compensation. The local health officer so appointed shall have the same duties, powers and authority as though appointed under RCW 70.05.050. Such local health officer shall serve until a qualified individual is appointed according to the procedures set forth in RCW 70.05.050.(2) The board or official responsible for appointing the local health officer under RCW 70.05.050 shall also be authorized to appoint an acting health officer to serve whenever the health officer is absent or incapacitated and unable to fulfill his or her responsibilities under the provisions of chapters 70.05 and 70.46 RCW.(3) In counties with a population of less than 100,000, the board or official responsible for appointing the local health officer under RCW 70.05.050 may appoint a person licensed to practice as an advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW or as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW to serve as an acting local health officer. The acting local health officer so appointed shall have the same duties, powers, and authority as though appointed under RCW 70.05.050. Such acting local health officer shall serve until a qualified individual is appointed according to the procedures set forth in RCW 70.05.050.Sec. 2. RCW 70.05.080 and 1993 c 492 s 240 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If the local board of health or other official responsible for appointing a local health officer under RCW 70.05.050 refuses or neglects to appoint a local health officer after a vacancy exists, the secretary of health may appoint a local health officer and fix the compensation. The local health officer so appointed shall have the same duties, powers and authority as though appointed under RCW 70.05.050. Such local health officer shall serve until a qualified individual is appointed according to the procedures set forth in RCW 70.05.050.(2) The board or official responsible for appointing the local health officer under RCW 70.05.050 shall also be authorized to appoint an acting health officer to serve whenever the health officer is absent or incapacitated and unable to fulfill his or her responsibilities under the provisions of chapters 70.05 and 70.46 RCW.(3) In counties with a population of less than 100,000, the board or official responsible for appointing the local health officer under RCW 70.05.050 may appoint a person licensed to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW or as a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW to serve as an acting local health officer. The acting local health officer so appointed shall have the same duties, powers, and authority as though appointed under RCW 70.05.050. Such acting local health officer shall serve until a qualified individual is appointed according to the procedures set forth in RCW 70.05.050.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30, 2027.--- END ---